Utah statutes.
52-1-8.   Official bonds -- Actions on -- Parties.

When a public officer by official misconduct or neglect of duty shall forfeit his official bond or render his sureties liable thereon, any person injured by such misconduct or neglect, or who is by law entitled to the benefit of the security, may maintain an action thereon in his own name against the officer and his sureties to recover the amount to which he may by reason thereof be entitled.

